Washington statutes.
RCW 18.33.040

Active military member or their spouse.

An active military member and their spouse shall not be required to pay to the commission for a compact privilege the fee otherwise charged by the commission. If a remote state chooses to charge a fee for a compact privilege, it may choose to charge a reduced fee or no fee to an active military member and their spouse for a compact privilege.

[ 2023 c 297 s 5.]